Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB242.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a revolving account to be
known as the grocery store initiative fund. The fund shall consist of moneys
received from state appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, and all
repayment, interest, or other return on the investment of fund dollars as
required by this section.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services.
(c) Moneys in the fund shall be used for the purposes set forth in this section.
(d) All repayment, interest, or other return on the investment of fund moneys
are required to be returned to the fund and used for eligible activities in
accordance with this section.
(e) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any moneys remaining in the fund at the
close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the
next fiscal year.
(2) The cabinet shall utilize the grocery store initiative fund to expand access to
healthy foods in underserved areas by providing grants, loans, and technical
assistance to eligible food retailers and food enterprises that are independently
owned for-profit grocery stores, cooperative grocery stores, nonprofit grocery
stores, or grocery stores owned and operated by local governmental units.
(3) The cabinet may place limits on the size of the food retailers and food enterprises
that are eligible for grants, loans, and technical assistance, including limits on
the annual revenue or projected revenue of the applicant, number of full-time
employees, or square footage of the facilities.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/24/2026 10:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1623
(4) The cabinet may prioritize grants, loans, public-private partnerships, and
technical assistance to applicants based on poverty rates, income, geographic
diversity, local ownership, access to grocery stores in the area surrounding
proposed project locations, and other factors as determined by the cabinet.
(5) The cabinet may make grants, loans, public-private partnerships, and technical
assistance awards for one (1) or more of the following:
(a) Market and site feasibility studies, promotional materials, and marketing;
(b) Salaries and benefits for workers;
(c) Rent or a down payment to acquire a facility;
(d) Establishing a new grocery store;
(e) Capital improvements, planning, renovations, land acquisition, demolition,
and durable and nondurable equipment purchases;
(f) Upgrades for existing food retailers and food enterprises; and
(g) Other costs as determined to be eligible by the cabinet.
(6) By October 1, 2027, and October 1 of each year thereafter, the cabinet shall
submit a report to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission for
referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services, which shall include:
(a) A summary of all grants, loans, public-private partnerships, and technical
assistance awards;
(b) An account of all funds received and awarded;
(c) A summary of all progress on activities funded; and
(d) Any recommendations for future initiatives or actions.
(7) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to implement this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/24/2026 10:36 AM Jacketed